en: Gilthead seabream
fr: Dorade royale

en: Wild gilthead seabream
fr: Daurade sauvage, Dorade royale sauvage, Vraie daurade sauvage

en: Farmed gilthead seabream
fr: Dorade royale d'élevage, Daurade d'élevage, Vraie daurade d'élevage

en: Freshwater bream
fr: Brème d'eau douce

en: Herring
bg: Херинга
de: Heringe, Hering
es: Arenques
fi: silli
fr: Harengs
hr: Haringa
it: Aringhe, aringa
ja: ヘリング
nl: Haring
pl: Śledzie, Śledź
ru: Сельдь

en: Herring fillets
bg: Филе от херинга
de: Heringsfilets
fr: Filets de harengs
hr: Fileti haringe
it: Filetti di aringa

en: Pickled herring, Bismarck herring
de: Bismarckhering, eingelegter Hering
fi: suolasilli
fr: Harengs marinés, hareng mariné, Hareng Bismarck, Harengs Bismarck
hr: Ukiseljena haringa
it: Aringhe sottaceto
nl: Zure haring

en: Rollmops, Rollmop
de: Rollmops, Rollmöpse
fr: Rollmops, Rollmop
hr: Rollmops
nl: Rolmops

en: Pacific herring
hr: Pacifička haringa
ja: ニシン, 鰊
ru: Сельдь тихоокеанская, тихоокеанская сельдь

en: Fried Atlantic herring
fr: Hareng frit

en: Grilled Atlantic herring, Pan-fried Atlantic herring
fr: Hareng grillé, Hareng poêlé

en: Atlantic herring
fr: Hareng
hr: Atlantska haringa
ja: タイセイヨウニシン

en: Lean Atlantic herring
fr: Hareng maigre

en: Oily Atlantic herring
fr: Hareng gras

en: Pike-perch
fr: Sandre
hr: Smuđ
ja: パイクパーチ

en: Anglers
de: Seeteufel
fr: Lottes
hr: Ribiči
nl: Kwabaal
tr: Fener balığı
zh: 安康鱼类

en: Grilled anglerfish
fr: Lotte grillée, Lotte poêlée, Baudroie grillée, Baudroie poêlée

en: Anglerfish
bg: Морски дявол
fr: Lotte, Baudroie
hr: Udica
zh: 安康鱼

en: Frozen anglerfish
fr: Lotte surgelée, Baudroie surgelée

en: Burbot
fr: Lotte de rivière